Hawaii statutes.
FEES AND
ACTIONS FOR RECOVERY OF LOSS

§501-211 Fees required for protection
against loss or damage. There shall be paid to the registrar upon the
original registration of land under this chapter, under absolute or qualified
ownership, one-tenth of one per cent of the assessed value of the land and
improvements on the basis of the last assessment for taxation.

Where the land sought to be registered was not
separately assessed at the time of the last assessment for taxation, the value
of the same shall be as found by the court as of July 1 preceding the date on
which the application was filed. The court may appoint one or more appraisers
at such rates of pay as it deems just, the cost to be taxed against the
applicant.

All moneys received by the registrar under this
section shall be paid to the director of finance as a realization to the
general fund. [L 1903, c 56, §94; am L 1913, c 21, §2; RL 1925, §3284; am L
1927, c 258, §10; am L 1932 2d, c 33, §1; am L 1933, c 25, §1; RL 1935, §5098;
RL 1945, §12698; am L 1945, c 255, §2; RL 1955, §342-98; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §501-211; am L 1972, c 91, §1(11)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next